Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3435.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 123B.51, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Limits on access by federal officials. new text end new text begin Except as required by state or federal law or as required to administer a state or federally supported educational program, school officials and employees of a school district or charter school must not allow a federal agent employed directly by the United States Department of Homeland Security or employed by United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement, United States Customs and Border Protection, or United States Citizenship and Immigration Services to enter a school site for any purpose without providing valid identification, a written statement of purpose, and a valid judicial warrant, and receiving approval from the superintendent of the district or person having administrative control of a charter school. If an officer or employee of the United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement meets the requirements under this subdivision, the district or charter school must limit access to areas where students are not present. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section if effective the day following final enactment. new text end